Georgia statutes. 
(a) (1) All directors and members of any downtown development authority created pursuant to Chapter 42 of this title, known as the "Downtown Development Authorities Law," or of any authority created by or pursuant to a local constitutional amendment, whether for the purpose of promoting the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities or for other purposes, to the extent that the Constitution of Georgia authorizes the General Assembly by law to define further and to enlarge or restrict the powers and duties of any such authority created by or pursuant to a local constitutional amendment shall comply with the provisions of Code Section 45-10-3, relating to a code of ethics of members of boards, commissions, and authorities and shall not engage in any transaction with the authority.

(2) The provisions of paragraph (9) of Code Section 45-10-3 and of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be deemed to have been complied with and any such authority may purchase from, sell to, borrow from, loan to, contract with, or otherwise deal with any director or member or any organization or person with which any director or member of said authority is in any way interested or involved, provided (1) that any interest or involvement by such director or member is disclosed in advance to the directors or members of the authority and is recorded in the minutes of the authority, (2) that any interest or involvement by such director with a value in excess of $200.00 per calendar quarter is published by the authority one time in the legal organ in which notices of sheriffs' sales are published in each county affected by such interest, at least 30 days in advance of consummating such transaction, (3) that no director having a substantial interest or involvement may be present at that portion of an authority meeting during which discussion of any matter is conducted involving any such organization or person, and (4) that no director having a substantial interest or involvement may participate in any decision of the authority relating to any matter involving such organization or person. As used in this subsection, a "substantial interest or involvement" means any interest or involvement which reasonably may be expected to result in a direct financial benefit to such director or member as determined by the authority, which determination shall be final and not subject to review.

(b) Nothing contained in subsection (a) of this Code section or in Code Section 45-10-3 shall be deemed to prohibit any director who is present at any decision of the authority from providing legal services in connection with any of the undertakings of the authority or from being paid for such services.

History

(Ga. L. 1982, p. 1726, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-62A-1, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1726, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1346, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 2010, p. 834, § 3/SB 456.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For survey article on local government law, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 225 (1982).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Interest in bank providing loans. - Individual, who is a chairperson and stockholder in a local bank negotiating authority loans, may be a member of a downtown authority and an industrial authority provided that the provisions of O.C.G.A. §§ 36-62-5 and 36-62A-1 are met. 1983 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U83-30.

——————————

ARTICLE 2

DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

36-62A-20. Development authority defined.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term "development authority" means any authority created by law or by constitutional amendment for one or more counties or municipalities, or any combination thereof, for the purpose of promoting the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities or for other purposes. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, such term shall specifically include all authorities created pursuant to Chapter 62 of this title.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62A-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1362, § 1.)

36-62A-21. Required training on development and redevelopment programs.

Statute text

Except for a director who is also a member of the governing body of a municipal corporation or county, each director or member of the governing board or body of a development authority shall attend and complete at least eight hours of training on development and redevelopment programs within the first 12 months of the director's or member's appointment to the development authority. Directors and members in office on January 1, 2000, shall be exempt from this requirement unless reappointed for an additional term.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62A-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1362, § 1.)

36-62A-22. Inapplicable to directors of downtown development authorities.

Statute text

This article shall not apply to directors of downtown development authorities created pursuant to Chapter 42 of this title, required training for such directors being as provided for in that chapter.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-62A-22, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1362, § 1.)

——————————

CHAPTER 63

RESOURCE RECOVERY DEVELOPMENT AUTHORITIES

Sec.

36-63-1. Short title.

36-63-2. Purpose of chapter.

36-63-3. Constitutional authority for chapter; finding of public purposes; tax exemption.

36-63-4. Definitions.

36-63-5. Authorities created; adoption and filing of resolution or ordinance of need; joint authorities.

36-63-6. Appointment and terms of members of board of directors; officers; compensation; adoption of bylaws and regulations; delegation of powers and duties.

36-63-7. Quorum of board; requirement of majority vote.

36-63-8. Powers of authority generally.

36-63-9. Obligations of authority; use of proceeds; status as revenue obligations; subsequent series of bonds or notes; bond anticipation notes; interest rates; issuance and validation.

36-63-10. Obligations of authority not indebtedness of state or political subdivisions.

36-63-11. Construction of chapter generally; applicability of certain other provisions of law to proceedings under chapter; effect of chapter with respect to other development authorities.

Annotations

Cross references. - Waste management generally, T. 12, C. 8.

36-63-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter may be referred to as the "Resource Recovery Development Authorities Law."

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1501a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

36-63-2. Purpose of chapter.

Statute text

(a) The recovery and utilization of resources contained in sewage sludge and solid waste and the generation of electrical and other forms of energy from water resources promotes trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities by creating a new industry to recover and utilize such resources and by creating a climate highly favorable to the location of new industrial facilities in areas where such resources are recovered or available by providing additional sources of energy and a method of processing and disposing of sewage and solid waste in an efficient and environmentally sound manner. It is therefore in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of the State of Georgia, and it is declared to be the purpose of this chapter, to create resource recovery development authorities to recover and utilize resources contained in sewage sludge, solid waste, and water resources. It is likewise in the public interest and is vital to the public welfare of the people of the State of Georgia, and it is declared to be the intent of this chapter to preserve and do nothing to interfere with the practice of recycling solid waste for use again by industry and the public thereby preserving and reusing important natural and other resources, except as specifically provided for in this chapter.

(b) It is the clearly articulated and affirmatively expressed policy of the State of Georgia that any resource recovery development authority, other authority, municipal corporation, county, other governmental body or agency, or private party shall be authorized, with respect to any solid waste, sewage sludge, or resources contained therein which the owner or generator thereof makes available to such resource recovery development authority, other authority, municipal corporation, county, or other governmental body or agency or private party to enter into agreements or in the case of a county or municipal corporation to enact ordinances or resolutions in furtherance of a project granting, directing, or providing for an exclusive right or rights in any of the foregoing parties with respect to such solid waste, sewage sludge, or resources contained therein, including, but not limited to, the exclusive right to collect, acquire, receive, transport, store, treat, process, utilize, sell, or dispose of discarded solid waste, sewage sludge, or resources contained therein; provided, however, excluded from such authorization shall be any rights to materials or substances contained in such solid waste, sewage sludge, or resources contained therein as may be separated for recycling at any time prior to pick up by or delivery to such resource recovery development authority, other authority, municipal corporation, county, or other governmental body or agency or private party of such discarded solid waste, sewage sludge, or resources contained therein.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1502a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 515, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1694, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 61B Am. Jur. 2d, Pollution Control, §§ 148, 171 et seq., 476, 532 et seq.

36-63-3. Constitutional authority for chapter; finding of public purposes; tax exemption.

Statute text

This chapter is enacted pursuant to authority granted to the General Assembly by the Constitution of Georgia. Each authority created by this chapter is created for nonprofit and public purposes; and it is found, determined, and declared that the creation of each such authority and the carrying out of its corporate purposes is in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state and that the authority is an institution of purely public charity and will be performing an essential governmental function in the exercise of the power conferred upon it by this chapter. For such reasons, the state covenants from time to time with the holders of the bonds issued under this chapter that such authority shall be required to pay no taxes or assessments imposed by the state or any of its counties, municipal corporations, political subdivisions, or taxing districts upon any property acquired by the authority or under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision or leased by it to others; or upon its activities in the operation or maintenance of any such property or on any income derived by the authority in the form of fees, recording fees, rentals, charges, purchase price, installments, or otherwise; and that the bonds of such authority, their transfer, and the income therefrom shall at all times be exempt from taxation within the state. The tax exemption provided in this Code section shall not include any exemption from sales and use tax on property purchased by the authority or for use by the authority.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1511a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article discussing tax-exempt financing in Georgia, see 18 Ga. St. B. J. 20 (1981).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

De facto zoning ordinance. - If a regulation has the effect of establishing zones of property in a county in which various uses are permitted and prohibited, then it is a zoning ordinance. Mullis Tree Serv., Inc. v. Bibb County, 822 F. Supp. 738 (M.D. Ga. 1993).

County regulation, in which each area zoned for residential use was to be surrounded by a buffer zone and in which the use of property as a putrescible waste landfill was prohibited, was actually a zoning ordinance, and adoption by an entity lacking power to zone was an ultra vires act. Therefore, this regulation was invalid under state law. Mullis Tree Serv., Inc. v. Bibb County, 822 F. Supp. 738 (M.D. Ga. 1993).

36-63-4. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this chapter, the term:

(1) "Authority" means each public corporation created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Collection" means the aggregating of solid waste from its primary source and includes all activities up to such time as the waste is delivered to the place at which it is to be processed.

(3) "Cost of project" means all costs of site preparation and other start-up costs; all costs of construction; all costs of real and personal property required for the purposes of the project and facilities related thereto, including land and any rights or undivided interest therein, easements, franchises, fees, permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates and the securing of such permits, approvals, licenses, and certificates, and all machinery and equipment, including motor vehicles which are used for project functions; financing charges and interest prior to and during construction and during such additional period as the authority may reasonably determine to be necessary for the placing of the project in operation; costs of engineering, architectural, and legal services; cost of plans and specifications and all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of the project; administrative expenses; and such other expenses as may be necessary or incidental to the financing authorized in this chapter. The costs of any project may also include funds for the creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, and such other reserves as may be reasonably required by the authority for the operation of its projects and as may be authorized by any bond resolution or trust agreement or indenture pursuant to the provisions of which the issuance of any such bonds may be authorized. Any obligation or expense incurred for any of the foregoing purposes shall be regarded as a part of the cost of the project and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of revenue bonds or notes issued under this chapter for such project.

(4) "County" means any county of this state or a governmental entity formed by the consolidation of a county and one or more municipal corporations.

(5) "Governing body" means the elected or duly appointed officials constituting the governing body of each municipal corporation and county in the state.

(6) "Municipal corporation" means each city and town in this state.

(7) "Project" means:

(A) The collection and transportation of solid waste and sewage sludge and it shall also mean any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing, utilization, or final disposal of resources contained in sewage sludge or solid waste, including the conversion of sewage sludge, solid waste, or resources contained therein into steam, electricity, oil, charcoal, gas, or any other product or energy source and the collection, storage, treatment, utilization, processing, or final disposal of sewage sludge and solid waste in connection with the foregoing; and

(B) Any property, real or personal, used as or in connection with a facility for the extraction, collection, storage, treatment, processing, or utilization of water resources and the conversion of such resources into any useful form of energy.

(8) "Resources" means any natural or synthetic substance contained in sewage sludge or solid waste which can be processed and reused in the same or a different form or which can be converted into usable energy and water resources which can be used as energy or converted into usable energy.

(9) "Sewage sludge" means all solid or dissolved materials in domestic or industrial sewage or other significant pollutants in water resources, such as salt, dissolved or suspended solids in waste-water effluents, human wastes, dissolved materials in irrigation return flows, and silt, after they are extracted from the medium in which they are contained.

(10) "Solid waste" means garbage, refuse, or other discarded solid materials, including solid waste materials resulting from industrial and agricultural operations and from community and domestic activities. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "garbage" shall include putrescible wastes, including animal and vegetable matters, animal offal and carcasses, and industrial by-products, and the term "refuse" shall include all nonputrescible wastes.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1503a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 515, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1992, p. 6, § 36.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 1 et seq. 39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, § 76. 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1 et seq.

36-63-5. Authorities created; adoption and filing of resolution or ordinance of need; joint authorities.

Statute text

(a) There is created in and for each county and municipal corporation in this state a public body corporate and politic, to be known as the "resource recovery development authority" of such county or municipal corporation. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this chapter until the governing body of the county or municipal corporation, by proper ordinance or resolution, declares that there is a need for an authority to function in the county or municipal corporation.

(b) Any number of counties and municipal corporations, whether or not located in the same county or within a county participating in the formation of a joint authority, may jointly form an authority, to be known as the "joint resource recovery development authority" for such counties and municipal corporations. No authority shall transact any business or exercise any powers under this chapter until the governing authorities of the units of local government involved declare, by ordinance or resolution, that there is a need for an authority to function and until the governing authorities authorize the chief elected official of the unit of local government to enter into an agreement with the other units of local government for the activation of an authority and such agreement is executed.

(c) A copy of such ordinances, resolutions, and agreements shall be filed with the Secretary of State, who shall maintain a record of all authorities activated under this chapter.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1504a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1694, § 2.)

36-63-6. Appointment and terms of members of board of directors; officers; compensation; adoption of bylaws and regulations; delegation of powers and duties.

Statute text

Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of five directors who shall be residents of the county or municipal corporation and shall serve at the pleasure of the governing authority of the county or municipal corporation. Directors shall be appointed, and may be reappointed, for terms of four years. In the case of a joint resource recovery development authority, each unit of local government participating in the authority shall appoint two members, with an additional member to be appointed by the directors themselves. The directors shall elect one of their members as chairman and another as vice-chairman and shall also elect a secretary and a treasurer or a secretary-treasurer, either of whom may but need not be a director. The directors shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The directors may make bylaws and regulations for the governing of the authority and may delegate to one or more of the officers, agents, and employees of the authority such powers and duties as may be deemed necessary and proper.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1505a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 562 et seq.

36-63-7. Quorum of board; requirement of majority vote.

Statute text

A majority of the directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business of the authority. However, any action with respect to any project of the authority must be approved by the affirmative vote of not less than a majority of the directors.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1506a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

36-63-8. Powers of authority generally.

Statute text

(a) Each authority shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including, but without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the power:

(1) To bring and defend actions;

(2) To adopt and amend a corporate seal;

(3) To acquire, construct, improve, or modify, to place into operation, and to operate or cause to be placed into operation and operated, either as owner of all or of any part in common with others, a project or projects within the county in which the authority is activated and, subject to execution of agreements with the appropriate political subdivisions affected, within other counties, and to pay all or part of the cost of any such project or projects from the proceeds of revenue bonds of the authority or from any contribution or loans by persons, firms, or corporations or any other contribution, all of which the authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use;

(4) To acquire, in its own name, by purchase on such terms and conditions and in such manner as it may deem proper or by gift, grant, lease, or otherwise, real property or rights and easements therein and franchises and personal property necessary or convenient for its corporate purposes, which purposes shall include, but shall not be limited to, the constructing or acquiring of a project, the improving, extending, adding to, reconstructing, renovating, or remodeling of any project or part thereof already constructed or acquired, or demolition to make room for such project or any part thereof, and to insure the same against any and all risks as such insurance may, from time to time, be available; the authority may also use such property and rent or lease the same to or from others or make contracts with respect to the use thereof or sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, pledge, or otherwise dispose of or grant options for any such property in any manner which the authority deems to the best advantage of itself and its purposes; provided that the powers to acquire, use, and dispose of property as set forth in this paragraph shall include the power to acquire, use, and dispose of any interest in such property, whether divided or undivided, which acquisition may result in the ownership of such property or any part thereof in common with any other party or parties, public or private; and title to any such property of the authority, however, shall be held by the authority exclusively for the benefit of the public;

(5) To make contracts and leases and to execute all instruments necessary or convenient, including contracts for construction of projects and leases of projects or contracts with respect to the use of projects which it causes to be acquired or constructed; provided that all private persons, firms, and corporations, this state, and all political subdivisions, departments, instrumentalities, or agencies of the state or of local government are authorized to enter into contracts, leases, or agreements with the authority, upon such terms and for such purposes as they deem advisable; and without limiting the generality of the above, authority is specifically granted to municipal corporations and counties and to the authority to enter into contracts, lease agreements, or other undertakings relative to the furnishing of project activities and facilities or either of them by the authority to such municipal corporations and counties and by such municipal corporations and counties to the authority for a term not exceeding 50 years;

(6) To exercise any one or more of the powers, rights, and privileges conferred by this Code section either alone or jointly or in common with one or more other public or private parties or public and private parties; in any such exercise of such powers, rights, and privileges jointly or in common with others with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of project facilities, the authority may own an undivided interest in such facilities with any other party with which it may jointly or in common exercise the rights and privileges conferred by this chapter; the authority may enter into an agreement or agreements with respect to any such project facility with the other party or parties participating therein; any such agreement may contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, consistent with this chapter, as the parties thereto shall deem to be in their best interests; any such agreement may include, but need not be limited to, provisions for the construction, operation, and maintenance of such project facility by any one or more party of the parties to such agreement, which party or parties shall be designated in or pursuant to such agreement as agent or agents on behalf of itself and one or more of the other parties thereto, or by such other means as may be determined by the parties thereto, and may include provisions for a method or methods of determining and allocating, among or between the parties, costs of construction, operation, maintenance, renewals, replacements, improvements, and disposals with respect to such facility; in carrying out its functions and activities as such agent with respect to construction, operation, and maintenance of such a facility, such agent shall be governed by the laws and regulations applicable to such agent as a separate legal entity and not by any laws or regulations which may be applicable to any of the other participating parties; provided, however, the agent shall act for the benefit of the public; notwithstanding anything contained in any other law to the contrary, pursuant to the terms of any such agreement, the authority may delegate its powers and duties with respect to the construction, operation, and maintenance of such facility to the party acting as agent; and all actions taken by such agent in accordance with the provisions of such agreement may be binding upon the authority without further action or approval of the authority;

(7) To extend credit or make loans to any person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity for the planning, design, construction, acquisition, or carrying out of any project, which credit or loans shall be secured by loan agreements, mortgages, security agreements, contracts, and all other instruments or fees or charges, upon such terms and conditions as the authority shall determine reasonable in connection with such loans, including provision for the establishment and maintenance of reserves and insurance funds, and in the exercise of powers granted by this Code section in connection with a project for such person, firm, corporation, or other industrial entity, to require the inclusion in any contract, loan agreement, security agreement, or other instrument of such provisions for guaranty, insurance, construction, use, operation, maintenance, and financing of a project as the authority may deem necessary or desirable;

(8) To acquire, accept, or retain equitable interests, security interests, or other interest in any property, real or personal, by mortgage, assignment, security agreement, pledge, conveyance, contract, lien, loan agreement, or other consensual transfer, in order to secure the repayment of any moneys loaned or credit extended by the authority;

(9) To accept, receive, and administer gifts, grants, appropriations, and donations of money, materials, and property of any kind, including loans and grants from the United States of America or this state, or a unit of local government, or any agency, department, authority, or instrumentality of either upon such terms and conditions as the United States of America, this state, a unit of local government, or such agency, department, authority, or instrumentality shall impose, to administer trusts, and to sell, lease, transfer, convey, appropriate, and pledge any and all of its property and assets;

(10) To invest any accumulation of its funds in any fund or reserve in any manner that public funds of this state or its political subdivisions may be invested;

(11) To do any and all things necessary or proper for the accomplishment of the objectives of this chapter and to exercise any power usually possessed by private corporations performing similar functions which is not in conflict with the Constitution and laws of this state, including the power to employ professional and administrative staff and personnel and to retain legal, engineering, fiscal, accounting, and other professional services; the power to purchase all kinds of insurance, including, without limitation, insurance against tort liability and against risks of damage to property; the power to borrow money for any of the corporate purposes of the authority; the power to indemnify and hold harmless any parties contracting with the authority or its agents from damage to persons or property; and the power to act as self-insurer with respect to any loss or liability; provided, however, that obligations of the authority other than revenue bonds, for which provision is made in this chapter, shall be payable from the general funds of the authority and shall not be a charge against any special fund allocated to the payment of revenue bonds;

(12) To mortgage, convey, pledge, or assign any properties, revenues, income, tolls, charges, or fees owned or received by the authority;

(13) To borrow money and issue its revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes from time to time and to use the proceeds thereof for the purpose of paying all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any such bonds of the authority theretofore issued; and to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter and to pay all other costs of the authority incident to, or necessary and appropriate to, such purposes, including the providing of funds to be paid into any fund or funds to secure such bonds and notes, provided that all such bonds and notes shall be issued in accordance with the procedures and subject to the limitations set forth in Code Section 36-63-9; and

(14) As security for repayment of authority obligations, to pledge, mortgage, convey, assign, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber any property, real or personal, of such authority and to execute any trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement containing any provisions not in conflict with law, which trust agreement, indenture, or security agreement may provide for foreclosure or forced sale of any property of the authority upon default on such obligations either in payment of principal or interest or in the performance of any term or condition contained in such agreement or indenture; this state, on behalf of itself and each county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district therein waives any right which it or such county, municipal corporation, political subdivision, or taxing district may have to prevent the forced sale or foreclosure of any property of the authority so mortgaged or encumbered, and any such mortgage or encumbrance may be foreclosed in accordance with law and the terms thereof.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, an authority is prohibited from bidding or paying compensation for solid wastes being privately processed or reused.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1507a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1006, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in AMBAC Indem. Corp. v. Akridge, 262 Ga. 773, 425 S.E.2d 637 (1993).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 568 et seq. 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1142 et seq. 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 2118 et seq.

ALR. - Disposition of revenues from operation of revenue-producing enterprise owned by municipal corporation, 165 A.L.R. 854.

36-63-9. Obligations of authority; use of proceeds; status as revenue obligations; subsequent series of bonds or notes; bond anticipation notes; interest rates; issuance and validation.

Statute text

(a) Subject to the limitations and procedures provided by this Code section, the obligations of any authority evidenced by bonds, bond anticipation notes, trust indentures, deeds to secure obligations, security agreements, or mortgages executed in connection therewith may contain such provisions not inconsistent with law as shall be determined by the board of directors of the authority. The authority, in such instruments, may provide for the pledging of all or any part of its revenues, income, or charges and for the mortgaging, encumbering, or conveying of all or any part of its real or personal property; may covenant against pledging any or all of its revenues, income, or charges; and may further provide for the disposition of proceeds realized from the sale of any bonds and bond anticipation notes, for the replacement of lost, destroyed, stolen, or mutilated bonds and notes, and for the payment and redemption of such bonds and notes. Similarly, subject to the limitations and procedures of this Code section, undertakings of an authority may prescribe the procedure by which bondholders and noteholders may enforce rights against the authority and provide for rights upon breach of any covenant, condition, or obligation of the authority. Bonds, resolutions, trust indentures, mortgages, or deeds to secure obligations executed by an authority and bond anticipation notes executed by an authority may contain such provisions not otherwise contrary to law as the authority shall deem necessary or desirable.

(b) The proceeds derived from the sale of all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be held and used for the ultimate purpose of paying, directly or indirectly as permitted in this chapter, all or part of the cost of any project, including the cost of extending, financing, adding to, or improving such project, or for the purpose of refunding any bond anticipation notes issued in accordance with this chapter or refunding any previously issued bonds of the authority.

(c) All bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority shall be revenue obligations of such authority and may be made payable out of any revenues or other receipts, funds, or moneys of the authority, subject only to any agreements with the holders of other bonds or bond anticipation notes or to particular security agreements pledging any particular revenues, receipts, funds, or moneys.

(d) Issuance by an authority of one or more series of bonds or bond anticipation notes for one or more purposes shall not preclude it from issuing other bonds or notes in connection with the same project or with any other projects, but the proceeding wherein any subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes shall be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made in any prior security agreement or made for any prior issue of bonds or bond anticipation notes, unless in the resolution authorizing such prior issue the right is expressly reserved to the authority to issue subsequent bonds or bond anticipation notes on a parity with such prior issue.

(e) An authority shall have the power and is authorized, whenever revenue bonds of the authority have been validated as provided in this chapter, to issue, from time to time, its notes in anticipation of the issuance of such bonds as validated and to renew from time to time any such notes by the issuance of new notes, whether the notes to be renewed have or have not matured. The authority may issue notes only to provide funds which would otherwise be provided by the issuance of the bonds as validated. The notes may be authorized, sold, executed, and delivered in the same manner as bonds. As with its bonds, the authority may sell such notes at public or private sale. Any resolution or resolutions authorizing notes of the authority or any issue thereof may contain any provisions which the authority is authorized to include in any such resolution or resolutions; and the authority may include in any notes any terms, covenants, or conditions which it is authorized to include in any bonds. Validation of such bonds shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of the notes, but it shall not be required that such notes be judicially validated. Bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in an amount exceeding the par value of the bonds in anticipation of which they are to be issued.

(f) The interest rate on or rates to be borne by any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the authority shall be fixed by the board of directors of the authority. Any limitations with respect to interest rates found in Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title or in the usury laws of this state shall not apply to obligations issued under this chapter.

(g) All revenue bonds issued by an authority under this chapter shall be issued and validated under and in accordance with Article 3 of Chapter 82 of this title, except as provided in subsection (f) of this Code section and except as specifically set forth below in this subsection:

(1) Revenue bonds issued by an authority may be in such form, either coupon or fully registered, or both coupon and fully registered, and may be subject to such exchangeability and transferability provisions as the bond resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or any indenture or trust agreement may provide;

(2) Revenue bonds shall bear a certificate of validation. The signature of the clerk of the superior court of the judicial circuit in which the issuing authority is located may be made on the certificate of validation of such bonds by facsimile or by manual execution, stating the date on which such bonds were validated; and such entry shall be original evidence of the fact of judgment and shall be received as original evidence in any court in this state;

(3) In lieu of specifying the rate or rates of interest which revenue bonds to be issued by an authority are to bear, the notice to the district attorney or the Attorney General and the notice to the public of the time, place, and date of the validation hearing may state that the bonds, when issued, will bear interest at a rate not exceeding a minimum per annum rate of interest specified in such notices or, in the event the bonds are to bear different rates of interest for different maturity dates, that none of such rates will exceed the maximum rate specified in the notices; provided, however, that nothing contained in this paragraph shall be construed as prohibiting or restricting the right of the authority to sell such bonds at a discount, even if in so doing the effective interest cost resulting therefrom would exceed the maximum per annum interest rate specified in such notices;

(4) The term "cost of project" shall have the meaning prescribed in paragraph (3) of Code Section 36-63-4 whenever referred to in bond resolutions of an authority, bonds and bond anticipation notes issued by an authority, or notices and proceedings to validate such bonds.

History

(Code 1933, § 69-1508a, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1898, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Revenue bonds generally, § 36-82-60 et seq.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 485 et seq. 64 Am. Jur. 2d, Public Securities and Obligations, § 193 et seq.
